Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.30, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Dwelling in micro units in sacred communities authorized. Religious institutions are authorized to provide permanent housing to people who are chronically homeless, extremely low-income, or designated volunteers, in sacred communities composed of micro units subject to the provisions of this section. Each religious institution that deleted text begin has siteddeleted text end new text begin sitesnew text end a sacred community must deleted text begin annually certify to the local unit of government that it has complieddeleted text end new text begin complynew text end with new text begin both (1) new text end the eligibility requirements for residents of a sacred community in this sectionnew text begin , and (2) the administrative approval process under subdivision 7, if the municipality has established such a processnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.30, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Sacred community requirements. (a) A sacred community must provide residents of micro units access to water and electric utilities either by connecting the micro units to the utilities that are serving the principal building on the lot or by other comparable means, or by providing the residents access to permanent common kitchen facilities and common facilities for toilet, bathing, and laundry with the number and type of fixtures required for an R-2 boarding house under Minnesota Rules, part 1305.2902. Any units that are plumbed shall not be included in determining the minimum number of fixtures required for the common facilities. (b) A sacred community under this section must: (1) be appropriately insured; (2) have between one-third and 40 percent of the micro units occupied by designated volunteers; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) provide the municipality with a written plan approved by the religious institution's governing board that outlines: (i) disposal of water and sewage from micro units if not plumbed; (ii) septic tank drainage if plumbed units are not hooked up to the primary worship location's system; (iii) adequate parking, lighting, and access to units by emergency vehicles; (iv) protocols for security and addressing conduct within the settlement; and (v) safety protocols for severe weathernew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) be established on land owned exclusively by the religious institution siting the sacred communitynew text end . (c) Unless the municipality has designated sacred communities meeting the requirements of this section as permitted uses, a sacred community meeting the requirements of this section shall be approved and regulated as a conditional use without the application of additional standards not included in this section. When approved, additional permitting is not required for individual micro units. (d) Sacred communities are subject to the laws governing landlords and tenants under chapter 504B. new text begin (e) The governing board of the religious institution that sites the sacred community must authorize one or more designated volunteers, religious institution governing board members, or a combination thereof, to take necessary actions to comply with the requirements of this section. At least one individual with compliance authority under this paragraph must be on the sacred community premises at all times. new text end new text begin (f) A municipality may approve or deny a written plan provided under paragraph (b), clause (3). An approval process established under this paragraph is subject to the governmental approval requirements under section 15.99. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.30, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Application of municipal rental housing licensing regulations. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality may regulate micro units in a sacred community as rental single-family residences or rental multifamily residences if: new text end new text begin (1) the municipality has adopted an ordinance establishing a rental housing licensing program; and new text end new text begin (2) the municipality adopts an ordinance or amends the rental housing licensing program ordinance to specify whether micro units in a sacred community are subject to regulation as either rental single-family residences or rental multifamily residences. new text end new text begin (b) The religious institution that sites the sacred community is responsible for compliance with the rental licensing regulations applicable to micro units under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.30, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Administrative approval process authorized. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality may adopt an administrative approval process for sacred communities that must be completed before a sacred community may be sited within the boundaries of the municipality. The administrative approval process is limited to a written application verifying: new text end new text begin (1) compliance with the requirements of this section; and new text end new text begin (2) compliance with local rental housing licensing requirements and other applicable state and federal laws or rules. new text end new text begin (b) A municipality may require a religious institution to submit information to the municipality for verification of continued compliance with paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), no more than once annually. new text end new text begin (c) A municipal approval process adopted under this subdivision is subject to the governmental approval requirements under section 15.99. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327.30, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Injunction. new text end new text begin A municipality may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a temporary or permanent injunction to enforce compliance with an administrative approval process or licensing requirement adopted under this section or a violation of state or federal law by a sacred community. new text end